Illinois, session 104th, HB4776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-635 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-635 new)8    Sec. 2705-635. Sovereign immunity. Sovereign immunity from 9civil suit in federal court is waived consistent with 23 10U.S.C. 326 and 327 and limited to the compliance, discharge, 11or enforcement of a responsibility assumed by the Department 12under this Law. This Section applies only to actions that are 13authorized under this Law and does not create liability that 14exceeds the liability created under 23 U.S.C. 326 and 327.